District of Columbia statutes.
9-502

Electric lamps on overhead wires prohibited.

No public electric lamp shall be maintained by means of overhead wires within either the city limits of Washington or the existing fire limits of the District of Columbia as existing March 2, 1911.

History

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1011, ch. 192, § 8

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-501.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-702.
1973 Ed., § 7-702.